District of Columbia statutes.
22-4332

Delegation of functions by Secretary of the Interior and Mayor; Council to make regulations; “Mayor” and “Secretary of the Interior” defined.

(a)

The Secretary of the Interior and the Mayor, respectively, are authorized to delegate any of the functions to be performed by them under the authority of this chapter.

(b)

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized to make such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter; provided, that any regulations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Interior insofar as they involve any areas or waters of the District of Columbia under the appropriate administrative jurisdiction.

(c)

As used in this chapter the word “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia or the appropriate designated agent or agents, and the words “Secretary of the Interior” means the Secretary of the Interior or the appropriate designated agent or agents.

History

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 5
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 11(b), 41 DCR 1639

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1632.
1973 Ed., § 22-1632.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(204) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-211), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-213(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.